Massachusetts, session 194th, S1479.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24A of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (m) the following subsection:-
(n) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1), the department shall exclude testosterone from the
list of drugs monitored in the prescription drug monitoring system.
SECTION 2. Immediately upon passage of this Act, the department shall delete from the
prescription monitoring system established under said section 24A any existing data concerning
the prescribing and dispensing of testosterone.
of 1